Maine, session 132, LD1701.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§18-H is enacted to read:
18-H.
Education Learning Results Implementation Not Authorized 20-A MRSA
Advisory Committee §14
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §14 is enacted to read:
§14. Learning Results Implementation Advisory Committee
1. Learning Results Implementation Advisory Committee. The Learning Results
Implementation Advisory Committee, referred to in this section as "the committee," is
established in Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 18-H to make recommendations to the
department on the development of curricula, resources and staff training related to the
implementation of learning results in the State.
2. Membership and staffing. The committee is composed of 10 members appointed
by the commissioner. The commissioner shall endeavor to appoint members who represent
the racial and ethnic populations in subsection 3, paragraph A. The chair of the committee
must be elected from among the committee membership by the members of the committee.
The department shall staff at least one position to provide administrative support to the
committee.
3. Duties of committee. The committee:
A. Shall make recommendations to the department regarding the development of
curricula, resources and staff training related to the study of the history and culture of
racial and ethnic populations in the State. Racial and ethnic populations to be the
subject of study under this section include, but are not limited to, Wabanaki, African
American, Asian American, Hispanic, Franco-American and Jewish populations;
B. Shall make recommendations to the department regarding the development of
curricula, resources and staff training related to financial literacy, civics and health
care;
C. May recommend to the department topics to be measured by learning indicators or
adjust learning indicators to reflect best practices. For purposes of this paragraph,
"learning indicator" means a process to measure and analyze the effectiveness and
ability of a learner to engage and progress within a learning environment;
D. Shall include in the recommendations under paragraphs A, B and C the use of the
department's online, open-source education platform that provides optional resources
at no cost to educators in the State on topic areas and themes identified as areas of need
by educators; and
E. Shall assist the department in developing program guidelines for the distribution of
grants under subsection 4.
4. Grants. The department shall establish a program to provide grants to school
administrative units and nonprofit organizations to implement programming and learning
activities based upon the recommendations of the committee under subsection 3 and other
learning results activities determined by the department.
Page 1 - 132LR0904(01)

5. Rules. The commissioner shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. Commissioner of Education to form committee. By January 15, 2026,
the Commissioner of Education shall make the appointments to the Learning Results
Implementation Advisory Committee under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20-A,
section 14 and convene the first meeting of the committee.
Sec. 4. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Learning Results Implementation Activities N516
Initiative: Provides one-time funds in fiscal year 2026-27 only for grants to implement
certain programs and learning activities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $500,000
1184 Learning Results Implementation Activities N516
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds for one half-time Interdisciplinary Instruction Specialist
position to support the work of a learning results implementation advisory committee in
implementing certain programs and learning activities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.500 0.500
Personal Services $60,861 $84,758
All Other $7,058 $9,410
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $67,919 $94,168
2282
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27

GENERAL FUND $67,919 $594,168
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $67,919 $594,168